Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-1712
Insolvent, defined.

Insolvent shall mean a condition in which (1) the actual cash market value of the assets of a credit union is insufficient to pay its liabilities to its members, (2) a credit union is unable to meet the demands of its creditors in the usual and customary manner, (3) a credit union, after demand in writing by the director, fails to make good any deficiency in its reserves as required by law, or (4) a credit union, after written demand by the director, fails to make good an impairment of its capital or surplus.

Laws 1996, LB 948, § 12.